Utah statutes.
36-11-401.   Penalties.
(1)  Any person who willfully and knowingly violates Section 36-11-103,
36-11-201, 36-11-301, 36-11-302, 36-11-303, 36-11-304, 36-11-305, or
36-11-403, is subject to the following penalties:
(a)  an administrative penalty of up to $1,000 for each violation; and
(b)  for each subsequent violation of that same section within 24 months,
either:
(i)  an administrative penalty of up to $5,000; or
(ii)  suspension of the violator's lobbying license for up to one year, if the
person is a lobbyist.
(2)  Any person who willfully and knowingly fails to file a financial report
required by this chapter, omits material information from a license
application form or financial report, or files false information on a license
application form or financial report, is subject to the following penalties:
(a)  an administrative penalty of up to $1,000 for each violation; or
(b)  suspension of the violator's lobbying license for up to one year, if the
person is a lobbyist.
(3)  Any person who willfully  and knowingly fails to file a financial report
required by this chapter on the date that it is due shall, in addition to the
penalties, if any, imposed under Subsection (1) or (2), pay a penalty of up to
$50 per day for each day that the report is late.
(4) (a)  When a lobbyist is convicted of violating Section 76-8-103, 76-8-107,
76-8-108, or 76-8-303, the lieutenant governor shall suspend the lobbyist's
license for up to five years from the date of the conviction.
(b)  When a lobbyist is convicted of violating Section 76-8-104 or 76-8-304,
the lieutenant governor  shall suspend a lobbyist's license for up to one year
from the date of conviction.
(5) (a)  Any person who willfully and knowingly violates Section 36-11-301,
36-11-302, or 36-11-303 is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.
(b)  The lieutenant governor shall suspend the lobbyist license of any person
convicted under any of these sections for up to one year.
(c)  The suspension shall be in addition to any administrative penalties
imposed by the lieutenant governor under this section.
(d)  Any person with evidence of a possible violation of this chapter may
submit that evidence to the lieutenant governor for investigation and
resolution.
(6)  Nothing in this chapter creates a third-party cause of action or appeal
rights.
